Texas, session 892, HB193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 36.1132(a), Water Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A district may not[, to the extent possible, shall] issue permits that hinder the achievement of [up to the point that the total volume of exempt and permitted groundwater production will achieve] an applicable desired future condition under Section 36.108 by authorizing a volume of groundwater production that, when considered together with exempt groundwater production, exceeds the volume of modeled available groundwater determined by the executive administrator. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.